Utah statutes.
62A-14-109.   Contract for services.

(1)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 6, Utah Procurement Code, the office may contract with one or more providers to perform guardian and conservator duties.

(2)  The office shall review and monitor the services provided by a contract provider to a ward for whom the office has been appointed guardian or conservator.

